Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5783YH (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 2314 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.37 Pediatric autoimmune 1 neuropsychiatric disorders and associated conditions ââ coverage. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 5 514J.102. 6 b. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 7 section 514J.102. 8 c. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 9 514J.102. 10 d. âPediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndromeâ or 11 âPANSâ means a clinically defined disorder characterized by 12 the sudden onset of obsessive-compulsive symptoms or eating 13 restrictions accompanied by two or more symptoms of either one 14 or both of the following: 15 (1) Acute behavioral deterioration. 16 (2) Motor and sensory changes. 17 e. âPediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders 18 associated with streptococcal infectionsâ or âPANDASâ means a 19 term used to describe a subset of children and adolescents 20 within the broader PANS classification. 21 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment 22 requirements of section 514C.6, a health carrier that offers 23 individual, group, or small group contracts, policies, or 24 plans in this state that provide for third-party payment 25 or prepayment of health or medical expenses shall offer 26 coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of PANS, PANDAS, 27 and postinfectious autoimmune encephalopathy as recommended 28 by a covered personâs health care professional as medically 29 necessary and that is consistent with the standard of 30 medical care and protocols established in collaboration 31 with the national institute of mental health, the childrenâs 32 postinfectious autoimmune encephalopathy center of excellence, 33 and the PANDAS physicians network. Treatment may include but 34 is not limited to antibiotics, drugs and behavioral therapies 35 -1- LSB 5783YH (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 2314 to manage neuropsychiatric symptoms, plasma exchange, and 1 immunoglobulin. 2 b. Coverage required under paragraph âaâ shall not be 3 denied or delayed because the covered person has received any 4 treatment, including the same or similar treatment, for PANS, 5 PANDAS, or postinfectious autoimmune encephalopathies. 6 c. Coverage required under paragraph âaâ shall not be denied 7 or delayed because the covered person has also been diagnosed 8 with or receives treatment for a medical condition other than 9 PANS, PANDAS, or postinfectious autoimmune encephalopathies. 10 d. Coverage required under paragraph âaâ shall not 11 be limited over a covered personâs lifetime unless by 12 policy period, or because the covered personâs health care 13 professional determines that the covered person is no longer 14 benefiting from the treatment recommended by the health care 15 professional. 16 3. This section shall not be construed to prohibit a health 17 carrier from requesting treatment notes, and anticipated 18 treatment duration outcome information, from a covered personâs 19 health care professional. 20 4. a. This section shall apply to the following classes 21 of third-party payment provider contracts, policies, or plans 22 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 23 state on or after January 1, 2027: 24 (1) Individual or group accident and sickness insurance 25 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 26 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 27 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 28 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 29 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 30 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 31 chapter 509A. 32 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, 33 specified disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital 34 confinement indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare 35 -2- LSB 5783YH (1) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 2314 supplement, long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical 1 expense coverage as defined by the commissioner, disability 2 income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a supplement 3 to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or similar 4 insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 5 5. The commissioner of insurance shall adopt rules pursuant 6 to chapter 17A as necessary to administer this section. 7